Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 9.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5215
Changes; when operative.

(1) The changes made in sections 77-5201, 77-5203, 77-5208, 77-5209, and 77-5211 to 77-5213 by Laws 2006, LB 990, shall become operative for all credits earned in tax years beginning or deemed to begin on and after January 1, 2007, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. For all credits earned in tax years beginning or deemed to begin prior to January 1, 2007, under the code, the provisions of the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act as they existed prior to such date shall apply.

(2) The changes made in sections 77-5203, 77-5209, and 77-5211 by Laws 2008, LB 1027, shall become operative for all credits earned in tax years beginning or deemed to begin on and after January 1, 2008, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. For all credits earned in tax years beginning or deemed to begin prior to January 1, 2008, under the code, the provisions of the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act as they existed prior to such date shall apply.

Laws 2006, LB 990, § 16;

Laws 2008, LB1027, § 9.